Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5267YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 2259 Section 1. Section 515.103, subsection 1, paragraph j, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 j. âPersonal insuranceâ means personal insurance and not 3 commercial insurance and is limited to private passenger 4 automobile, homeowners, farm owners, personal farm liability, 5 motorcycle, mobile home owners, noncommercial dwelling fire, 6 boat, and personal watercraft , snowmobile, and recreational 7 vehicle insurance policies, that are individually underwritten 8 for personal, family, farm, or household use. No other type of 9 insurance is included as personal insurance for the purposes of 10 this section . 11 Sec. 2. Section 515.103, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Prohibited use of credit 14 information. An insurer authorized to do business in this state 15 shall not use credit information to underwrite or rate risks 16 for a motor vehicle financial liability coverage policy. For 17 purposes of this subsection, âfinancial liability coverageâ 18 means as defined in section 321.1, subsection 24B, paragraph 19 âaâ . 20